Nevada, session 83, AB82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 236 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Governor shall annually proclaim the
fifteenth day of the eighth month of the Hindu calendar to be
“Diwali Day” in the State of Nevada.
2. The proclamation may call upon the news media,
educators, business and labor leaders and appropriate
governmental officers to bring to the attention of the residents of
Nevada the diversity and inclusion of the cultures that celebrate
Diwali in the State of Nevada and throughout the world.
Sec. 3. 1. The Governor shall annually proclaim the first
day of the tenth month of the Islamic calendar to be “Eid al-Fitr
Day” in the State of Nevada.
2. The proclamation may call upon the news media,
educators, business and labor leaders and appropriate
governmental officers to bring to the attention of the residents of
Nevada the diversity and inclusion of the cultures that celebrate
Eid al-Fitr in the State of Nevada and throughout the world.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 4. 1. The Governor shall annually proclaim the first
day of the month of Vaisakh of the Sikh calendar to be “Vaisakhi
Day” in the State of Nevada.
2. The proclamation may call upon the news media,
educators, business and labor leaders and appropriate
governmental officers to bring to the attention of the residents of
Nevada the diversity and inclusion of the cultures that celebrate
Vaisakhi in the State of Nevada and throughout the world.
Sec. 5. 1. The Governor shall annually proclaim the day of
the first full moon in the month of May to be “Vesak Day,” also
known as “Buddha Day,” in the State of Nevada.
2. The proclamation may call upon the news media,
educators, business and labor leaders and appropriate
governmental officers to bring to the attention of the residents of
Nevada the diversity and inclusion of the cultures that celebrate
Vesak in the State of Nevada and throughout the world.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)